Massachusetts, session 194th, H661.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 1B of Chapter 69 of the General Laws as appearing in the 2020 Official Edition
is hereby amended by inserting after the 25th paragraph the following paragraphs:
“The board of elementary and secondary education shall establish regulations regarding,
in the K-12 public schools of the Commonwealth, the use of whole-grade and content-specific
academic acceleration designed to match the level, complexity, and pace of instruction of the
curriculum to the readiness and motivation of the student; enabling accelerated students to
master knowledge and skills, as they may be capable, at a rate faster or at an age earlier than the
typical age-average student. Said regulations shall authorize, provide a framework, and direct
school districts to provide access to appropriate curriculum, instruction and pacing for students
who demonstrate readiness for academic content, skills or understanding at a level beyond the
curriculum ordinarily taught to students of a certain age.
of 3

To ensure equity in education, the acceleration regulations established pursuant to this
section shall direct that schools evaluate all children to determine the need for acceleration
accommodations, not only those students recommended for acceleration by teachers and parents.
Said regulations shall require the use of screening assessments, and an evaluation tool designed
to take personal bias out of the decision-making process when considering a child for
acceleration; and to ensure that acceleration decisions are evidence-based, systematic,
thoughtful, well-reasoned, and defensible. Such regulations shall require that any determination
made regarding acceleration accommodations for a student shall be documented in a written
acceleration plan including, at a minimum, relevant academic and social-emotional supports.
Said written acceleration plan shall be implemented by administrators, counselors, and
teachers. All districts shall provide professional development for educators to ensure a
supportive environment for accelerated students and document it in their plans pursuant to
Chapter 71 Section 38Q . The Department of Elementary and Secondary Education shall
develop and make available professional development and other assistance for implementation of
acceleration plans.
In developing said regulations, the department shall consider, at a minimum, the
following acceleration strategies:
Single subject acceleration;
Combined classes (multi-age);
Online courses and open educational resources;
Concurrent or dual enrollment, and early college;
of 3

Curriculum compacting;
Credit by examination or prior experience;
Credit toward graduation requirements for high-school level courses taken during
elementary and middle school
Competency/mastery-based learning and advancement;
Whole-grade acceleration (one or more);
Self-paced instruction;
Mentoring;
Early entrance to first grade;
Early graduation”
of 3